Utah statutes.
4-3-9.   Licenses, permits, and certificates -- Suspension or revocation --
Grounds.
(1)  The department may revoke or suspend the license, permit, or
certification of any person who violates this chapter or any rule enacted
under the authority of this chapter.
(2)  All or part of any license, permit, or certification may be suspended
immediately if an emergency exists that presents a clear and present danger to
the public health, or if inspection or sampling is refused.
